District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.43

Resignation and removal of officers.

(a)

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the nonprofit corporation. A resignation shall be effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective time. If a resignation is made effective at a later time and the board of directors or the appointing officer accepts the future effective time, the board or the appointing officer may designate a successor before the effective time if the board or the appointing officer provides that the successor does not take office until the effective time.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, an officer may be removed at any time with or without cause by:

(1)

The board of directors;

(2)

The officer who appointed the officer being removed, unless the board provides otherwise; or

(3)

Any other officer authorized by the articles, the bylaws, or the board.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term “appointing officer” means the officer, including any successor to that officer, who appointed the officer resigning or being removed.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-401.50.

Section References